Illinois, session 104th, HB4810.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Dental Practice Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2, 4, 5, 8.5, 12.5, 13.05, 13.15, 15.5, 16, 616.1, 17, 18.5, 19, 19.1, 20, 21, 23, 24, 25, 25.1, 26, 34, 36, 737, 38.1, 51, 54.2, 54.3, and 55 and by adding Sections 7.7, 814.5, and 14.6 as follows: 9    (225 ILCS 25/2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2302)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)11    Sec. 2. Legislative declaration of public policy. The 12practice of dentistry in the State of Illinois is hereby 13declared to affect the public health, safety and welfare and 14to be subject to regulation and control in the public 15interest. It is further declared to be a matter of public 16interest and concern that the dental profession merit and 17receive the confidence of the public and that only qualified 18persons be permitted to practice dentistry in the State of 19Illinois. Despite the authority granted under this Act 20allowing dentists to delegate the performance of certain 21procedures to dental therapists, dental hygienists, and dental 22assistants, nothing contained in this Act shall be construed 23in any way to relieve the supervising dentist from ultimate   HB4810- 2 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1responsibility for the care of the patient. This Act shall be 2liberally construed to carry out these objects and purposes.3    It is further declared to be the public policy of this 4State, pursuant to subsections (h) and (i) of Section 6 of 5Article VII of the Illinois Constitution of 1970, that any 6power or function set forth in this Act to be exercised by the 7State is an exclusive State power or function. Such power or 8function shall not be exercised concurrently, either directly 9or indirectly, by any unit of local government, including home 10rule units, except as otherwise provided in this Act.11(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 12    (225 ILCS 25/4)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)14    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act:15    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 16by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 17file or license file as maintained by the Department's 18licensure maintenance unit. It is the duty of the applicant or 19licensee to inform the Department of any change of address and 20those changes must be made either through the Department's 21website or by contacting the Department. 22    "Email address of record" means the designated email 23address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 24application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 25by the Department's licensure maintenance unit.   HB4810- 3 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 2Professional Regulation.3    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 4Professional Regulation.5    "Board" means the Board of Dentistry.6    "Dentist" means a person who has received a general 7license pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 11 of this Act, 8and who may perform any intraoral and extraoral procedure 9required in the practice of dentistry, and to whom is reserved 10the responsibilities specified in Section 17.11    "Dental hygienist" means a person who holds a license 12under this Act to perform dental services as authorized by 13Section 18.14    "Dental therapist" means a person licensed to practice 15dental therapy as authorized by Section 14.6.16    "Dental therapist supervision" means the supervision of a 17dental therapist by a licensed dentist who has a collaborative 18management agreement with the dental therapist that allows the 19dental therapist to treat patients in any setting outlined by 20the collaborative management agreement without a dentist first 21examining the patient or being present in the facility during 22treatment. 23    "Dental therapy" means the provision of services described 24in Section 14.6 and any related services or procedures 25required in the performance of those services.26    "Dental assistant" means an appropriately trained person   HB4810- 4 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1who, under the supervision of a dentist, provides dental 2services as authorized by Section 17.3    "Expanded function dental assistant" means a dental 4assistant who has completed the training required by Section 517.1 of this Act. 6    "Dental laboratory" means a person, firm, or corporation 7which:8        (i) engages in making, providing, repairing, or 9    altering dental prosthetic appliances and other artificial 10    materials and devices which are returned to a dentist for 11    insertion into the human oral cavity or which come in 12    contact with its adjacent structures and tissues; and13        (ii) utilizes or employs a dental technician to 14    provide such services; and15        (iii) performs such functions only for a dentist or 16    dentists.17    "Supervision" means supervision of a dental hygienist or a 18dental assistant requiring that a dentist authorize the 19procedure, remain in the dental facility while the procedure 20is performed, and approve the work performed by the dental 21hygienist or dental assistant before dismissal of the patient, 22but does not mean that the dentist must be present at all times 23in the treatment room.24    "General supervision" means supervision of a dental 25hygienist requiring that the patient be a patient of record, 26that the dentist examine the patient in accordance with   HB4810- 5 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1Section 18 prior to treatment by the dental hygienist, and 2that the dentist authorize the procedures which are being 3carried out by a notation in the patient's record, but not 4requiring that a dentist be present when the authorized 5procedures are being performed. The issuance of a prescription 6to a dental laboratory by a dentist does not constitute 7general supervision.8    "Probationary dental therapist supervision" means 9supervision of a dental therapist by the supervising 10collaborative dentist, during the dental therapist's 11probationary supervision period, as determined by the 12supervising collaborative dentist and outlined by the 13collaborative management agreement, requiring (i) that the 14patient be a patient of record, (ii) that the dentist examines 15the patient in accordance with Section 18.5 prior to treatment 16by the dental therapist, and (iii) that the dentist authorize 17the procedures to be carried out by a notation in the patient's 18record. After the probationary dental therapist supervision 19period, the dental therapist may work under dental therapist 20supervision.21    "Public member" means a person who is not a health 22professional. For purposes of board membership, any person 23with a significant financial interest in a health service or 24profession is not a public member.25    "Dentistry" means the healing art which is concerned with 26the examination, diagnosis, treatment planning, and care of   HB4810- 6 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1conditions within the human oral cavity and its adjacent 2tissues and structures, as further specified in Section 17.3    "Branches of dentistry" means the various specialties of 4dentistry which, for purposes of this Act, shall be limited to 5the following: endodontics, oral and maxillofacial surgery, 6orthodontics and dentofacial orthopedics, pediatric dentistry, 7periodontics, prosthodontics, oral and maxillofacial 8radiology, dental anesthesiology, oral and maxillofacial 9pathology, dental public health, oral medicine, and orofacial 10pain.11    "Specialist" means a dentist who has received a specialty 12license pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 11.13    "Dental technician" means a person who owns, operates, or 14is employed by a dental laboratory and engages in making, 15providing, repairing, or altering dental prosthetic appliances 16and other artificial materials and devices which are returned 17to a dentist for insertion into the human oral cavity or which 18come in contact with its adjacent structures and tissues.19    "Informed consent" means legally valid consent that is 20given by a patient or legal guardian, that is recorded in 21writing or digitally, that authorizes intervention or 22treatment services from the treating dentist, and that 23documents agreement to participate in those services and 24knowledge of the risks, benefits, and alternatives, including 25the decision to withdraw from or decline treatment. 26    "Impaired dentist", "impaired dental therapist", or   HB4810- 7 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1"impaired dental hygienist" means a dentist, dental therapist, 2or dental hygienist who is unable to practice with reasonable 3skill and safety because of a physical or mental disability as 4evidenced by a written determination or written consent based 5on clinical evidence, including deterioration through the 6aging process, loss of motor skills, abuse of drugs or 7alcohol, or a psychiatric disorder, of sufficient degree to 8diminish the person's ability to deliver competent patient 9care.10    "Nurse" means a registered professional nurse, a certified 11registered nurse anesthetist licensed as an advanced practice 12registered nurse, or a licensed practical nurse licensed under 13the Nurse Practice Act.14    "Patient of record", except as provided in Section 17.2, 15means a patient for whom the patient's most recent dentist, 16dental therapist, or public health dental hygienist has 17obtained a relevant medical and dental history and on whom the 18dentist, dental therapist, or public health dental hygienist 19has performed an a physical examination within the last year 20and evaluated the conditions condition to be treated, 21including a review of the patient's most recent x-rays.22    "Dental responder" means a dentist, dental therapist, or 23dental hygienist who is appropriately certified in disaster 24preparedness, immunizations, and dental humanitarian medical 25response consistent with the Society of Disaster Medicine and 26Public Health and training certified by the National Incident   HB4810- 8 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1Management System or the National Disaster Life Support 2Foundation. 3    "Mobile dental van or portable dental unit" means any 4self-contained or portable dental unit in which dentistry is 5practiced that can be moved, towed, or transported from one 6location to another in order to establish a location where 7dental services can be provided.8    "Public health dental hygienist" means a hygienist who 9holds a valid license to practice in the State, has 2 years of 10full-time clinical experience or an equivalent of 4,000 hours 11of clinical experience, and has completed at least 42 clock 12hours of additional structured courses in dental education in 13advanced areas specific to public health dentistry.14    "Public health setting" means a federally qualified health 15center; a federal, State, or local public health facility; 16Head Start; a special supplemental nutrition program for 17Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) facility; a certified 18school-based health center or school-based oral health 19program; a prison; or a long-term care facility.20    "Public health supervision" means the supervision of a 21public health dental hygienist by a licensed dentist who has a 22written public health supervision agreement with that public 23health dental hygienist while working in an approved facility 24or program that allows the public health dental hygienist to 25treat patients, without a dentist first examining the patient 26and being present in the facility during treatment, (1) who   HB4810- 9 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1are eligible for Medicaid or (2) who are uninsured or whose 2household income is not greater than 300% of the federal 3poverty level. 4    "Teledentistry" means the use of telehealth systems and 5methodologies in dentistry and includes patient diagnosis, 6treatment planning, care, and education delivery for a patient 7of record using synchronous and asynchronous communications 8under an Illinois licensed dentist's authority as provided 9under this Act.10    "Moderate sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 11consciousness during which: (1) patients respond purposefully 12to verbal commands, either alone or accompanied by light 13tactile stimulation; (2) no interventions are required to 14maintain a patient's airway and spontaneous ventilation is 15adequate; and (3) cardiovascular function is usually 16maintained.17    "Deep sedation" means a drug-induced depression of 18consciousness during which: (1) patients cannot be easily 19aroused, but respond purposefully following repeated or 20painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently maintain 21ventilatory function may be impaired; (3) patients may require 22assistance in maintaining airways and spontaneous ventilation 23may be inadequate; and (4) cardiovascular function is usually 24maintained.25    "General anesthesia" means a drug-induced loss of 26consciousness during which: (1) patients are not arousable,   HB4810- 10 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1even by painful stimulation; (2) the ability to independently 2maintain ventilatory function is often impaired; (3) patients 3often require assistance in maintaining airways and positive 4pressure ventilation may be required because of depressed 5spontaneous ventilation or drug-induced depression of 6neuromuscular function; and (4) cardiovascular function may be 7impaired.8    "Venipuncture" means the puncture of a vein as part of a 9medical procedure, typically to withdraw a blood sample or for 10an intravenous catheter for the administration of medication 11or fluids.12    "Enteral route of administration" means administration of 13a drug that is absorbed through the gastrointestinal tract or 14through oral, rectal, or sublingual mucosa.15    "Parenteral route of administration" means administration 16of a drug by which the drug bypasses the gastrointestinal 17tract through intramuscular, intravenous, intranasal, 18submucosal, subcutaneous, or intraosseous methods. 19(Source: P.A. 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-431, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-628, eff. 7-1-24; 103-902, eff. 218-9-24; 104-103, eff. 8-1-25; 104-151, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, 22eff. 8-15-25; revised 9-15-25.) 23    (225 ILCS 25/5)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2305)24    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)25    Sec. 5. Powers and duties of Department. Subject to the   HB4810- 11 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1provisions of this Act, the Department shall exercise the 2following functions, powers and duties:3    (a) Conduct or authorize examinations to ascertain the 4fitness and qualifications of applicants for dental licenses, 5dental therapist licenses, or dental hygienist licenses, pass 6upon the qualifications of applicants for licenses, and issue 7licenses to such as are found to be fit and qualified.8    (b) Prescribe rules and regulations for a method of 9examination of candidates.10    (c) Prescribe rules and regulations defining what shall 11constitute an approved program, school, college or department 12of a university except that no program, school, college or 13department of a university that refuses admittance to 14applicants solely on account of race, color, creed, sex or 15national origin shall be approved.16    (d) Conduct hearings on proceedings to revoke, suspend, or 17on objection to the issuance of licenses and to revoke, 18suspend or refuse to issue such licenses.19    (e) Promulgate rules and regulations required for the 20administration of this Act.21    (f) The Department may require completion of a census by 22all licensed dentists in order to obtain relevant information 23regarding the availability of dental services within the 24State. 25(Source: P.A. 94-1014, eff. 7-7-06.)   HB4810- 12 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    (225 ILCS 25/8.5)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)3    Sec. 8.5. Unlicensed practice; violation; civil penalty. 4    (a) Any person who practices, offers to practice, attempts 5to practice, or holds oneself out to practice dentistry, 6dental therapy, or dental hygiene without being licensed under 7this Act shall, in addition to any other penalty provided by 8law, pay a civil penalty to the Department in an amount not to 9exceed $10,000 for each offense as determined by the 10Department. The civil penalty shall be assessed by the 11Department after a hearing is held in accordance with the 12provisions set forth in this Act regarding the provision of a 13hearing for the discipline of a licensee.14    (b) The Department has the authority and power to 15investigate any and all unlicensed activity.16    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 17the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. 18The order shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and 19execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment from 20any court of record.21(Source: P.A. 99-492, eff. 12-31-15.) 22    (225 ILCS 25/12.5 new)23    Sec. 12.5. Necessity for licensure of dental therapists. 24No person, unless the person is a dentist, shall perform the 25operative procedures of dental therapy without first applying   HB4810- 13 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1for and obtaining a license for such purpose. The Department 2shall issue a license authorizing practice as a dental 3therapist to any person who qualifies for such license 4pursuant to this Act. In addition to the license authorized by 5this Section, the Department shall deliver to each dental 6therapist a separate certificate of identification in a form 7specified by the Department. 8    (225 ILCS 25/13.05 new)9    Sec. 13.05. Qualifications of applicants for dental 10therapy licenses. Every person who desires to obtain a license 11as a dental therapist shall apply to the Department in 12writing, upon forms prepared and furnished by the Department. 13Each application shall contain proof of the particular 14qualifications required of the applicant, shall be verified by 15the applicant under oath, and shall be accompanied by the 16required examination fee.17    The Department shall require that every applicant for a 18license as a dental therapist:19        (1) Be at least 21 years of age and of good moral 20    character.21        (2) Present satisfactory evidence of having 22    successfully completed a dental therapy program accredited 23    by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American 24    Dental Association.25        (3) Submit evidence that he or she holds a currently   HB4810- 14 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    valid certification to perform cardiopulmonary 2    resuscitation. The Department shall adopt rules 3    establishing criteria for certification in cardiopulmonary 4    resuscitation. The rules of the Department shall provide 5    for exceptions only in instances where the applicant is a 6    person with a physical disability and therefore unable to 7    secure such certification.8        (4) Present satisfactory evidence that he or she has 9    successfully completed a dental therapy examination 10    administered by one of the following regional testing 11    services:12            (i) Central Regional Dental Testing Service, Inc. 13        (CRDTS);14            (ii) States Resources for Testing and Assessments, 15        Inc. (SRTA) (formerly, Southern Regional Testing 16        Agency, Inc.); or17            (iii) Commission on Dental Competency Assessments -18         Western Regional Examining Board - Council of 19        Interstate Testing Agencies, Inc. (CDCA-WREB-CITA).20        For the purposes of this paragraph (4), "successfully 21    completed" means that the applicant has achieved a minimum 22    passing score as determined by the applicable regional 23    testing service under this paragraph (4).24        The Secretary may suspend a regional testing service 25    under this paragraph (4) if, after proper notice and 26    hearing, it is established that (i) the integrity of the   HB4810- 15 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    examination has been breached so as to make future test 2    results unreliable or (ii) the examination is 3    fundamentally deficient in testing clinical competency.  4    (225 ILCS 25/13.15 new)5    Sec. 13.15. Dental therapist collaborative management 6agreement. After completion of the requirements of Section 713.05 and a period of probationary dental therapist 8supervision, a dental therapist may operate under the 9conditions described in Section 14.6 and under supervision by 10a supervising collaborative dentist. 11    (225 ILCS 25/14.5 new)12    Sec. 14.5. Examination for licensure as a dental 13therapist. The examination of applicants for licensure as 14dental therapists may include both practical demonstrations 15and written tests and shall encompass the subjects usually 16taught in programs of dental therapy, approved by the 17Department. If an applicant fails to pass an examination for 18licensure under this Act within 3 years after filing an 19application, the application shall be denied. The applicant 20may reapply for examination if the applicant pays the required 21fee and provides evidence of meeting the requirements in 22effect at the time of reapplication. 23    (225 ILCS 25/14.6 new)  HB4810- 16 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    Sec. 14.6. Dental therapists; scope and area of practice. 2    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, a dental 3therapist may perform the dental therapy services specified in 4subsection (b) under dental therapist supervision to the 5extent authorized by the supervising dentist and provided 6within the terms of a collaborative management agreement that 7meets the requirements of subsection (c) and that is signed by 8the dental therapist and the supervising dentist.9    (b) Dental therapy services shall include all of the 10following:11        (1) All services, treatments, and competencies 12    identified by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of 13    the American Dental Association in the Accreditation 14    Standards for Dental Therapy Education Programs.15        (2) The following State-specific services, if the 16    dental therapist's education included curriculum content 17    satisfying the criteria established by the Commission on 18    Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association 19    for State-specific dental therapy services:20            (A) comprehensive charting of the oral cavity;21            (B) supragingival and subgingival scaling and 22        polishing;23            (C) dental sealant application;24            (D) exposure and evaluation of radiographic and 25        other images;26            (E) placement and removal of space maintainers;  HB4810- 17 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1            (F) removal of caries on primary and permanent 2        teeth; 3            (G) placement of direct restorations on primary 4        and permanent teeth; 5            (H) pulp vitality testing; 6            (I) pulpotomies on primary teeth; 7            (J) fabrication and placement of single-tooth 8        temporary crowns;9            (K) placement of periodontal dressings;10            (L) extraction of erupted primary teeth and Class 11        III and IV mobility teeth on adults;12            (M) suture removal;13            (N) laser bacterial reduction and treatment of 14        oral lesions;15            (O) brush biopsies;16            (P) tooth reimplantation and stabilization;17            (Q) fabrication of athletic mouthguards;18            (R) minor adjustments and repair of removable 19        prosthetic devices;20            (S) removal and repair of broken orthodontic 21        appliances;22            (T) recementation of permanent crowns;23            (U) emergency palliative treatment of dental pain; 24            (V) vaccine administration; 25            (W) administering or offering non-opioid 26        analgesics, including nitrous oxide,   HB4810- 18 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        anti-inflammatories, local and topical anesthetics, 2        antibiotics, antimicrobials, and fluorides, as 3        authorized by the supervising collaborative dentist 4        and the collaborative management agreement; and 5            (X) oral evaluation and assessment of oral 6        conditions and dental disease and formulation of an 7        individualized treatment plan if authorized by the 8        supervising collaborative dentist and subject to any 9        conditions, limitations, and protocols specified by 10        the supervising collaborative dentist in the 11        collaborative management agreement. 12    (c) Before performing any of the services authorized in 13subsection (b), a dental therapist shall enter into a 14collaborative management agreement with a supervising dentist. 15The agreement shall be signed by the dental therapist and the 16supervising collaborative dentist and shall include all of the 17following information:18        (1) practice settings where services may be provided 19    by the dental therapist and the populations to be served 20    by the dental therapist;21        (2) any limitations on the services that may be 22    provided by the dental therapist, including the level of 23    supervision required by the supervising dentist and 24    teledentistry;25        (3) age-specific and procedure-specific practice 26    protocols for the dental therapist, including case   HB4810- 19 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    selection criteria, assessment guidelines, and imaging 2    frequency;3        (4) a procedure for creating and maintaining dental 4    records for the patients who are treated by the dental 5    therapist;6        (5) a plan to manage medical emergencies in each 7    practice setting where the dental therapist provides care;8        (6) a quality assurance plan for monitoring care 9    provided by the dental therapist, including patient care 10    review, referral follow-up, and a quality assurance chart 11    review;12        (7) protocols for the dental therapist to administer 13    or offer medications, including the specific conditions 14    and circumstances under which the medications are to be 15    administered or offered;16        (8) criteria relating to the provision of care by the 17    dental therapist to patients with specific medical 18    conditions or complex medication histories, including 19    requirements for consultation before the initiation of 20    care;21        (9) supervision criteria of dental therapists; and22        (10) a plan for the provision of clinical resources 23    and referrals in situations that are beyond the 24    capabilities of the dental therapist.25    (d) A supervising collaborative dentist shall determine 26the number of hours of practice that a dental therapist must   HB4810- 20 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1complete under probationary dental therapist supervision 2before the dental therapist may perform any of the services 3authorized in subsection (b) under dental therapist 4supervision.5    (e) A supervising collaborative dentist may restrict or 6limit the dental therapist's practice in the collaborative 7management agreement to be less than the full scope of 8practice for dental therapists that is authorized in 9subsection (b).10    (f) A supervising collaborative dentist may authorize a 11dental therapist to provide dental therapy services to a 12patient before the supervising collaborative dentist examines 13or diagnoses the patient if the authority, conditions, and 14protocols are established in a collaborative management 15agreement and if the patient is subsequently referred to a 16dentist for any needed additional services that exceed the 17dental therapist's scope of practice or authorization under 18the collaborative management agreement.19    (g) A supervising collaborative dentist must be licensed 20and practicing in this State. The supervising collaborative 21dentist is responsible for all services authorized and 22performed by the dental therapist pursuant to the 23collaborative management agreement and for providing or 24arranging follow-up services to be provided by a dentist for 25any additional services that exceed the dental therapist's 26scope of practice or authorization under the collaborative   HB4810- 21 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1management agreement.2    (h) A licensed dental therapist may provide services in 3any of the following health care settings:4        (1) a hospital;5        (2) a health care facility or agency other than a 6    hospital;7        (3) a Federally Qualified Health Center (FQHC) or a 8    FQHC Look-Alike;9        (4) a nonprofit dental practice or a nonprofit 10    organization that provides dental care to low-income and 11    underserved individuals;12        (5) a tribal clinic;13        (6) a correctional facility;14        (7) a long-term care facility;15        (8) a military or Veterans Administration hospital, 16    clinic, or care setting;17        (9) an oral health educational institution;18        (10) a school-based health center;19        (11) a local health department;20        (12) a health care setting in a geographic area 21    designated as a Dental Health Professional Shortage Area 22    by the United States Department of Health and Human 23    Services;24        (13) any other clinic or practice setting, including a 25    mobile dental unit, in which at least 50% of the annual 26    active patient count of the dental therapists at the   HB4810- 22 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    clinic or practice setting consists of patients who meet 2    any of the following characteristics:3            (A) are enrolled in a medical assistance program 4        established under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid 5        Code;6            (B) have a disability or chronic condition that 7        creates a significant barrier to receiving dental 8        care; or9            (C) do not have dental coverage and have an annual 10        gross family income equal to 200% of the federal 11        poverty guidelines updated periodically in the Federal 12        Register by the United States Department of Health and 13        Human Services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902; 14        and 15        (14) any other facility authorized to offer dental 16    care under State law. 17    (225 ILCS 25/15.5 new)18    Sec. 15.5. List of dentists, dental therapists, and dental 19hygienists. The Department shall maintain a list of the names 20and addresses of all dentists, dental therapists, and dental 21hygienists and of all persons whose licenses have been 22suspended or revoked together with such other information 23relative to the enforcement of the provisions of this Act as it 24may deem of interest to the public. Such lists shall also be 25mailed by the Department to any person upon request and   HB4810- 23 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1payment of the required fee. In addition, the Department shall 2keep available for inquiry or inspection a similar list of all 3persons whose licenses have been suspended or revoked in the 4interim between such published lists. All lists required to be 5published or kept by this Section shall be arranged 6alphabetically. 7    (225 ILCS 25/16)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2316)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)9    Sec. 16. Expiration, renewal and restoration of licenses. 10The expiration date and renewal date for each license issued 11under this Act shall be set by rule. The renewal period for 12each license issued under this Act shall be 3 years. A dentist, 13dental therapist, or dental hygienist may renew a license 14during the month preceding its expiration date by paying the 15required fee. All initial licenses issued during an open 16renewal period shall have the next expiration date. A dentist, 17dental therapist, or dental hygienist shall provide proof of 18current Basic Life Support (BLS) certification intended for 19health care providers at the time of renewal as provided by 20rule. Basic Life Support certification training taken as a 21requirement of this Section shall be counted for no more than 4 22hours during each licensure period towards the continuing 23education hours under Section 16.1 of this Act. The Department 24shall provide by rule for exemptions from this requirement for 25a dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist with a   HB4810- 24 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1physical disability that would preclude the dentist or dental 2hygienist from performing BLS. 3    Any dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist whose 4license has expired or whose license is on inactive status may 5have the license restored at any time within 5 years after the 6expiration thereof, upon payment of the required fee and a 7showing of proof of compliance with current continuing 8education requirements, as provided by rule.9    Any person whose license has been expired for more than 5 10years or who has had a license on inactive status for more than 115 years may have the license restored by making application to 12the Department and filing proof acceptable to the Department 13of taking continuing education and of the person's fitness to 14have the license restored, including sworn evidence certifying 15to active practice in another jurisdiction, and by paying the 16required license restoration fee. A person practicing on an 17expired license is deemed to be practicing without a license. 18However, a holder of a license may renew the license within 90 19days after its expiration by complying with the requirements 20for renewal and payment of an additional fee. A license 21renewal within 90 days after expiration shall be effective 22retroactively to the expiration date. 23    If a person whose license has expired or who has had a 24license on inactive status for more than 5 years has not 25maintained an active practice satisfactory to the Department 26department, the Department shall determine, by an evaluation   HB4810- 25 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1process established by rule, the person's fitness to resume 2active status and may require the person to complete a period 3of evaluated clinical experience and may require successful 4completion of a practical examination.5    However, any person whose license expired while the person 6was (i) on active duty with the Armed Forces of the United 7States or called into service or training by the State militia 8or (ii) in training or education under the supervision of the 9United States preliminary to induction into the military 10service, may have the person's license renewed, reinstated, or 11restored without paying any lapsed renewal or restoration fee, 12if within 2 years after termination of such service, training, 13or education other than by dishonorable discharge, the person 14furnishes the Department with satisfactory proof that the 15person has been so engaged and that the person's service, 16training, or education has been so terminated.17(Source: P.A. 103-687, eff. 7-19-24; 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 18    (225 ILCS 25/16.1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2316.1)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)20    Sec. 16.1. Continuing education. The Department shall 21promulgate rules of continuing education for persons licensed 22under this Act. In establishing rules, the Department shall 23require a minimum of 48 hours of study in approved continuing 24education courses for dentists, dental therapists, and public 25health dental hygienists during each 3-year licensing period   HB4810- 26 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1and a minimum of 36 hours of study in approved continuing 2education courses for dental hygienists during each 3-year 3licensing period.4    The Department shall approve only courses that are 5relevant to the treatment and care of patients, including, but 6not limited to, clinical courses in dentistry and dental 7hygiene and nonclinical courses such as patient management, 8legal and ethical responsibilities, and stress management. The 9Department shall allow up to 4 hours of continuing education 10credit hours per license renewal period for volunteer hours 11spent providing clinical services at, or sponsored by, a 12nonprofit community clinic, local or state health department, 13or a charity event. Courses shall not be approved in such 14subjects as estate and personal financial planning, personal 15investments, or personal health. Approved courses may include, 16but shall not be limited to, courses that are offered or 17sponsored by approved colleges, universities, and hospitals 18and by recognized national, State, and local dental and dental 19hygiene organizations. When offering a continuing education 20course, whether at no cost or for a fee, the course provider 21shall explicitly disclose that the course is an approved 22course for continuing education in the State of Illinois, as 23provided in this Section or by the rules adopted by the 24Department. 25    No license shall be renewed unless the renewal application 26is accompanied by an affidavit indicating that the applicant   HB4810- 27 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1has completed the required minimum number of hours of 2continuing education in approved courses as required by this 3Section. The affidavit shall not require a listing of courses. 4The affidavit shall be a prima facie evidence that the 5applicant has obtained the minimum number of required 6continuing education hours in approved courses. The Department 7shall not be obligated to conduct random audits or otherwise 8independently verify that an applicant has met the continuing 9education requirement. The Department, however, may not 10conduct random audits of more than 10% of the licensed 11dentists, dental therapists, and dental hygienists in any one 12licensing cycle to verify compliance with continuing education 13requirements. If the Department, however, receives a complaint 14that a licensee has not completed the required continuing 15education or if the Department is investigating another 16alleged violation of this Act by a licensee, the Department 17may demand and shall be entitled to receive evidence from any 18licensee of completion of required continuing education 19courses for the most recently completed 3-year licensing 20period. Evidence of continuing education may include, but is 21not limited to, canceled checks, official verification forms 22of attendance, and continuing education recording forms, that 23demonstrate a reasonable record of attendance. The Board shall 24determine, in accordance with rules adopted by the Department, 25whether a licensee or applicant has met the continuing 26education requirements. Any dentist who holds more than one   HB4810- 28 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1license under this Act shall be required to complete only the 2minimum number of hours of continuing education required for 3renewal of a single license. The Department may provide 4exemptions from continuing education requirements.5(Source: P.A. 103-425, eff. 1-1-24.) 6    (225 ILCS 25/17)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)8    Sec. 17. Acts constituting the practice of dentistry. A 9person practices dentistry, within the meaning of this Act:10        (1) Who represents himself or herself as being able to 11    diagnose or diagnoses, treats, prescribes, or operates for 12    any disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, injury, or 13    physical condition of the human tooth, teeth, alveolar 14    process, gums, or jaw; or15        (2) Who is a manager, proprietor, operator, or 16    conductor of a business where dental operations are 17    performed; or18        (3) Who performs dental operations of any kind; or19        (4) Who uses an X-Ray machine or X-Ray films for 20    dental diagnostic purposes; or21        (5) Who extracts a human tooth or teeth, or corrects 22    or attempts to correct malpositions of the human teeth or 23    jaws; or24        (6) Who offers or undertakes, by any means or method, 25    to diagnose, treat, or remove stains, calculus, and   HB4810- 29 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    bonding materials from human teeth or jaws; or2        (7) Who uses or administers local or general 3    anesthetics in the treatment of dental or oral diseases or 4    in any preparation incident to a dental operation of any 5    kind or character; or6        (8) Who takes material or digital scans for final 7    impressions of the human tooth, teeth, or jaws or performs 8    any phase of any operation incident to the replacement of 9    a part of a tooth, a tooth, teeth, or associated tissues by 10    means of a filling, a crown, a bridge, a denture, or other 11    appliances appliance; or12        (9) Who offers to furnish, supply, construct, 13    reproduce, or repair, or who furnishes, supplies, 14    constructs, reproduces, or repairs, prosthetic dentures, 15    bridges, or other substitutes for natural teeth to the 16    user or prospective user thereof; or17        (10) Who instructs students on clinical matters or 18    performs any clinical operation included in the curricula 19    of recognized dental or dental therapy schools and 20    colleges; or21        (11) Who takes material or digital scans for final 22    impressions of human teeth or places the person's hands in 23    the mouth of any person for the purpose of applying teeth 24    whitening materials, or who takes impressions of human 25    teeth or places the person's hands in the mouth of any 26    person for the purpose of assisting in the application of   HB4810- 30 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    teeth whitening materials. A person does not practice 2    dentistry when the person discloses to the consumer that 3    the person is not licensed as a dentist under this Act and 4    (i) discusses the use of teeth whitening materials with a 5    consumer purchasing these materials; (ii) provides 6    instruction on the use of teeth whitening materials with a 7    consumer purchasing these materials; or (iii) provides 8    appropriate equipment on-site to the consumer for the 9    consumer to self-apply teeth whitening materials. 10    The fact that any person engages in or performs, or offers 11to engage in or perform, any of the practices, acts, or 12operations set forth in this Section, shall be prima facie 13evidence that such person is engaged in the practice of 14dentistry.15    The following practices, acts, and operations, however, 16are exempt from the operation of this Act:17        (a) The rendering of dental relief in emergency cases 18    in the practice of the person's profession by a physician 19    or surgeon, licensed as such under the laws of this State, 20    unless the person undertakes to reproduce or reproduces 21    lost parts of the human teeth in the mouth or to restore or 22    replace lost or missing teeth in the mouth; or23        (b) The practice of dentistry in the discharge of 24    their official duties by dentists in any branch of the 25    Armed Services of the United States, the United States 26    Public Health Service, or the United States Veterans   HB4810- 31 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    Administration; or2        (c) The practice of dentistry by students in their 3    course of study in dental schools or colleges approved by 4    the Department, when acting under the direction and 5    supervision of dentists acting as instructors; or6        (d) The practice of dentistry by clinical instructors 7    in the course of their teaching duties in dental or dental 8    therapy schools or colleges approved by the Department:9            (i) when acting under the direction and 10        supervision of dentists, provided that such clinical 11        instructors have instructed continuously in this State 12        since January 1, 1986; or13            (ii) when holding the rank of full professor at 14        such approved dental or dental therapy school or 15        college and possessing a current valid license or 16        authorization to practice dentistry in another 17        country; or18        (e) The practice of dentistry by licensed dentists of 19    other states or countries at meetings of the Illinois 20    State Dental Society or component parts thereof, alumni 21    meetings of dental colleges, or any other like dental 22    organizations, while appearing as clinicians; or23        (f) The use of X-Ray machines for exposing X-Ray films 24    or digital images of dental or oral tissues by dental 25    therapists, dental hygienists, or dental assistants; or26        (g) The performance of any dental service by a dental   HB4810- 32 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    therapist, dental hygienist, or dental assistant, if such 2    service is performed under the supervision and full 3    responsibility of a dentist. In addition, after being 4    authorized by a dentist, a dental assistant, dental 5    therapist, or dental hygienist may, for the purpose of 6    eliminating pain or discomfort, remove loose, broken, or 7    irritating orthodontic appliances on a patient of record. 8        For purposes of this paragraph (g), "dental service" 9    is defined to mean any intraoral procedure or act which 10    shall be prescribed by rule or regulation of the 11    Department. "Dental service", however, shall not include:12            (1) Any and all diagnosis of or prescription for 13        treatment of disease, pain, deformity, deficiency, 14        injury, or physical condition of the human teeth or 15        jaws, or adjacent structures.16            (2) Removal of, restoration of, or addition to the 17        hard or soft tissues of the oral cavity, except for the 18        placing, carving, and finishing of amalgam 19        restorations and placing, packing, and finishing 20        composite restorations by dental therapists and dental 21        assistants who have had additional formal education 22        and certification. 23            A dental assistant or dental therapist may place, 24        carve, and finish amalgam restorations, place, pack, 25        and finish composite restorations, and place interim 26        restorations if the dental assistant (A) has   HB4810- 33 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        successfully completed a structured training program 2        as described in item (2) of paragraph subsection (g) 3        provided by an educational institution accredited by 4        the Commission on Dental Accreditation, such as a 5        dental or dental therapy school or a dental hygiene or 6        dental assistant program, or (B) has at least 4,000 7        hours of direct clinical patient care experience and 8        has successfully completed a structured training 9        program as described in item (2) of paragraph 10        subsection (g) provided by a statewide dental 11        association, approved by the Department to provide 12        continuing education, that has developed and conducted 13        training programs for expanded functions for dental 14        therapists, dental assistants, or dental hygienists. 15        The training program must: (i) include a minimum of 16 16        hours of didactic study and 14 hours of clinical 17        manikin instruction; all training programs shall 18        include areas of study in nomenclature, caries 19        classifications, oral anatomy, periodontium, basic 20        occlusion, instrumentations, pulp protection liners 21        and bases, dental materials, matrix and wedge 22        techniques, amalgam placement and carving, rubber dam 23        clamp placement, and rubber dam placement and removal; 24        (ii) include an outcome assessment examination that 25        demonstrates competency; (iii) require the supervising 26        dentist to observe and approve the completion of 8   HB4810- 34 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        amalgam or composite restorations; and (iv) issue a 2        certificate of completion of the training program, 3        which must be kept on file at the dental office and be 4        made available to the Department upon request. A 5        dental assistant must have successfully completed an 6        approved coronal polishing and dental sealant course 7        prior to taking the amalgam and composite restoration 8        course. 9            A dentist utilizing dental assistants shall not 10        supervise more than 4 dental assistants at any one 11        time for placing, carving, and finishing of amalgam 12        restorations or for placing, packing, and finishing 13        composite restorations.14            (3) Any and all correction of malformation of 15        teeth or of the jaws.16            (4) Administration of anesthetics, except for 17        monitoring of nitrous oxide, moderate sedation, deep 18        sedation, and general anesthetic as provided in 19        Section 8.1 of this Act, that may be performed only 20        after successful completion of a training program 21        approved by the Department. A dentist utilizing dental 22        assistants shall not supervise more than 4 dental 23        assistants at any one time for the monitoring of 24        nitrous oxide.25            (5) Removal of calculus from human teeth.26            (6) Taking of material or digital scans for final   HB4810- 35 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        impressions for the fabrication of prosthetic 2        appliances, crowns, bridges, inlays, onlays, or other 3        restorative or replacement dentistry.4            (7) The operative procedure of dental hygiene 5        consisting of oral prophylactic procedures, except for 6        coronal polishing and pit and fissure sealants, which 7        may be performed by a dental assistant who has 8        successfully completed a training program approved by 9        the Department. Dental assistants may perform coronal 10        polishing under the following circumstances: (i) the 11        coronal polishing shall be limited to polishing the 12        clinical crown of the tooth and existing restorations, 13        supragingivally; (ii) the dental assistant performing 14        the coronal polishing shall be limited to the use of 15        rotary instruments using a rubber cup or brush 16        polishing method (air polishing is not permitted); and 17        (iii) the supervising dentist shall not supervise more 18        than 4 dental assistants at any one time for the task 19        of coronal polishing or pit and fissure sealants.20            In addition to coronal polishing and pit and 21        fissure sealants as described in this item (7), a 22        dental assistant who has at least 2,000 hours of 23        direct clinical patient care experience and who has 24        successfully completed a structured training program 25        provided by (1) an educational institution including, 26        but not limited to, a dental school or dental hygiene   HB4810- 36 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        or dental assistant program, (2) a continuing 2        education provider approved by the Department, or (3) 3        a statewide dental or dental hygienist association 4        that has developed and conducted a training program 5        for expanded functions for dental assistants or 6        hygienists may perform: (A) coronal scaling above the 7        gum line, supragingivally, on the clinical crown of 8        the tooth only on patients 17 years of age or younger 9        who have an absence of periodontal disease and who are 10        not medically compromised or individuals with special 11        needs and (B) intracoronal temporization of a tooth. 12        The training program must: (I) include a minimum of 32 13        hours of instruction in both didactic and clinical 14        manikin or human subject instruction; all training 15        programs shall include areas of study in dental 16        anatomy, public health dentistry, medical history, 17        dental emergencies, and managing the pediatric 18        patient; (II) include an outcome assessment 19        examination that demonstrates competency; (III) 20        require the supervising dentist to observe and approve 21        the completion of 6 full mouth supragingival scaling 22        procedures unless the training was received as a part 23        of a Commission on Dental Accreditation approved 24        dental assistant program; and (IV) issue a certificate 25        of completion of the training program, which must be 26        kept on file at the dental office and be made available   HB4810- 37 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        to the Department upon request. A dental assistant 2        must have successfully completed an approved coronal 3        polishing course prior to taking the coronal scaling 4        course. A dental assistant performing these functions 5        shall be limited to the use of hand instruments only. 6        In addition, coronal scaling as described in this 7        paragraph shall only be utilized on patients who are 8        eligible for Medicaid, who are uninsured, or whose 9        household income is not greater than 300% of the 10        federal poverty level. A dentist may not supervise 11        more than 2 dental assistants at any one time for the 12        task of coronal scaling.13        The limitations on the number of dental assistants a 14    dentist may supervise contained in items (2), (4), and (7) 15    of this paragraph (g) mean a limit of 4 total dental 16    assistants or dental hygienists doing expanded functions 17    covered by these Sections being supervised by one dentist; 18    or19        (h) The practice of dentistry by an individual who:20            (i) has applied in writing to the Department, in 21        form and substance satisfactory to the Department, for 22        a general dental license and has complied with all 23        provisions of Section 9 of this Act, except for the 24        passage of the examination specified in subsection (e) 25        of Section 9 of this Act; or26            (ii) has applied in writing to the Department, in   HB4810- 38 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        form and substance satisfactory to the Department, for 2        a temporary dental license and has complied with all 3        provisions of subsection (c) of Section 11 of this 4        Act; and5            (iii) has been accepted or appointed for specialty 6        or residency training by a hospital situated in this 7        State; or8            (iv) has been accepted or appointed for specialty 9        training in an approved dental program situated in 10        this State; or11            (v) has been accepted or appointed for specialty 12        training in a dental public health agency situated in 13        this State.14        The applicant shall be permitted to practice dentistry 15    for a period of 3 months from the starting date of the 16    program, unless authorized in writing by the Department to 17    continue such practice for a period specified in writing 18    by the Department.19        The applicant shall only be entitled to perform such 20    acts as may be prescribed by and incidental to the 21    applicant's program of residency or specialty training and 22    shall not otherwise engage in the practice of dentistry in 23    this State.24        The authority to practice shall terminate immediately 25    upon:26            (1) the decision of the Department that the   HB4810- 39 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        applicant has failed the examination; or2            (2) denial of licensure by the Department; or3            (3) withdrawal of the application.4(Source: P.A. 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-431, eff. 1-1-24; 5103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-628, eff. 7-1-24; 104-103, eff. 68-1-25; 104-151, eff. 1-1-26; revised 11-21-25.) 7    (225 ILCS 25/18.5 new)8    Sec. 18.5. Dental therapist supervision responsibilities.9    (a) When working together, the dentist and dental 10therapist shall enter into a collaborative management 11agreement. The dentist providing dental therapist supervision 12shall:13        (1) define the period of probationary dental therapist 14    supervision which would allow the dentist and dental 15    therapist to work together collaboratively before they 16    work together via dental therapist supervision;17        (2) be available to provide an appropriate level of 18    contact, communication, collaboration, and consultation 19    with the dental therapist and must meet in person with the 20    dental therapist at least quarterly for review and 21    consultation;22        (3) have specific standing orders or policy guidelines 23    for procedures that are to be carried out for each 24    location or program, although the dentist need not be 25    present when the procedures are being performed;  HB4810- 40 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        (4) provide for the patient's additional necessary 2    care in consultation with the dental therapist;3        (5) file agreements and notifications as required; and4        (6) include procedures for creating and maintaining 5    dental records, including protocols for transmission of 6    all records between the dental therapist and the dentist 7    following each treatment, which shall include a notation 8    regarding procedures authorized by the dentist and 9    performed by the dental therapist and the location where 10    those records are to be kept.11    Each dentist and dental therapist who enters into a 12collaborative management agreement must document and maintain 13a copy of any change or termination of that agreement.14    Dental records shall be owned and maintained by the 15supervising collaborative dentist for all patients treated by 16the dental therapist unless the supervising collaborative 17dentist is an employee of a public health clinic or federally 18qualified health center, in which case the public health 19clinic or federally qualified health center shall maintain the 20records.21    If a dentist ceases to be employed or contracted by a 22facility, the dentist shall notify the facility administrator 23that the dental therapy collaborative management agreement is 24no longer in effect. A new collaborative management agreement 25is required for the dental therapist to continue treating 26patients.  HB4810- 41 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    A dentist entering into an agreement under this Section 2may supervise and enter into agreements for dental therapist 3collaborative management supervision with 2 dental therapists. 4This subsection (a) shall be in addition to the limit of 4 5dental hygienists per dentist set forth in subsection (g) of 6Section 18.7    (b) A dental therapist providing services under a 8collaborative management agreement may perform only those 9duties within the accepted scope of practice in the 10collaborative management agreement, described in Section 14.6, 11and other procedures and acts as shall be determined by the 12Department by rule.13    (c) A dental therapist providing services under a 14collaborative management agreement shall:15        (1) provide to the patient, parent, or guardian a 16    written plan for referral or an agreement for follow-up 17    that records all conditions observed that should be called 18    to the attention of a dentist for proper diagnosis;19        (2) have each patient sign a consent form that informs 20    them that they are receiving care from a licensed dental 21    therapist working under the supervision of a licensed 22    dentist;23        (3) inform each patient who may require further dental 24    services of that need; and25        (4) maintain an appropriate level of contact and 26    communication with the supervising collaborative dentist   HB4810- 42 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    providing collaborative management agreement supervision.2    (d) Dental therapists providing services under a 3collaborative management agreement may be compensated for the 4dental therapist's work by salary, honoraria, and other 5mechanisms by the employing or sponsoring entity. Nothing in 6this Act shall preclude the entity that employs or sponsors a 7dental therapist from seeking payment, reimbursement, or other 8sources of funding for the services provided.  9    (225 ILCS 25/19)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2319)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)11    Sec. 19. Endorsement. Any person who has been lawfully 12licensed to practice dentistry, including the practice of a 13licensed dental specialty, dental therapy, or dental hygiene 14in another state or territory or as a member of the military 15service which has and maintains a standard for the practice of 16dentistry, a dental specialty, dental therapy, or dental 17hygiene at least equal to that now maintained in this State, or 18if the requirements for licensure in such state or territory 19in which the applicant was licensed were, at the date of the 20applicant's licensure, substantially equivalent to the 21requirements then in force in this State, and who has been 22lawfully engaged in the practice of dentistry or dental 23hygiene for at least 2 years immediately preceding the filing 24of the application to practice in this State and who shall 25deposit with the Department a duly attested certificate from   HB4810- 43 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1the Board of the state or territory in which the person is 2licensed, certifying to the fact of the person's licensing and 3of the person being a person of good moral character may, upon 4payment of the required fee, be granted a license to practice 5dentistry, a dental specialty, dental therapy, or dental 6hygiene in this State, as the case may be.7    For the purposes of this Section, "substantially 8equivalent" means that the applicant has presented evidence of 9completion and graduation from an American Dental Association 10Commission on Dental Accreditation (CODA) accredited dental 11college or school in the United States or Canada, presented 12evidence that the applicant has passed both parts of the 13National Board Dental Examination, except when the applicant 14is applying for a license to practice dental therapy, and has 15successfully completed an examination conducted by a regional 16testing service.17    Applicants have 3 years from the date of application to 18complete the application process. If the process has not been 19completed in 3 years, the application shall expire 3 years 20after the date of submission of the application, the fee shall 21be forfeited, and the applicant must reapply and meet the 22requirements in effect at the time of reapplication.23(Source: P.A. 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 24    (225 ILCS 25/19.1)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)  HB4810- 44 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    Sec. 19.1. Temporary authorization of applicants from 2other jurisdictions. A person holding an active, unencumbered 3license in good standing in another jurisdiction who applies 4for a license pursuant to Section 19 of this Act due to a 5natural disaster or catastrophic event in another 6jurisdiction, may be temporarily authorized by the Secretary 7to practice dentistry, dental therapy, or dental hygiene under 8the supervision of a dentist licensed under this Act, pending 9the issuance of the license. This temporary authorization 10shall expire upon the issuance of the license or upon 11notification that the Department has denied licensure.12    The Department may adopt all rules necessary for the 13administration of this Section.14(Source: P.A. 94-1014, eff. 7-7-06.) 15    (225 ILCS 25/20)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2320)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)17    Sec. 20. Display of licenses. Any person licensed to 18practice dentistry, dental therapy, or dental hygiene in this 19State by the Department as hereinbefore provided, shall at all 20times display such license or duplicate original thereof in a 21conspicuous place, in the person's office wherein the person 22shall practice such profession, and shall further, whenever 23requested, exhibit such license to any of the members of the 24Department or its authorized agent. Upon proof by affidavit, 25the Department shall provide a duplicate if such person   HB4810- 45 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1establishes that the person's license is lost or stolen or 2that the person practices at multiple locations.3(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 4    (225 ILCS 25/21)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2321)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)6    Sec. 21. Fees. The fees for the administration and 7enforcement of this Act, including but not limited to original 8licensure, renewal, and restoration fees, shall be set by the 9Department by rule. However, the fee for application for 10renewal of a license as a dentist or specialist is $100 per 11year and the fee for application for renewal of a license as a 12dental therapist or dental hygienist is $50 per year. The fees 13shall be nonrefundable.14(Source: P.A. 92-523, eff. 2-8-02.) 15    (225 ILCS 25/23)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2323)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)17    Sec. 23. Refusal, revocation or suspension of dental 18licenses. The Department may refuse to issue or renew, or may 19revoke, suspend, place on probation, reprimand or take other 20disciplinary or non-disciplinary action as the Department may 21deem proper, including imposing fines not to exceed $10,000 22per violation, with regard to any license for any one or any 23combination of the following causes:24        1. Fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment in   HB4810- 46 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    applying for or procuring a license under this Act, or in 2    connection with applying for renewal of a license under 3    this Act.4        2. Inability to practice with reasonable judgment, 5    skill, or safety as a result of habitual or excessive use 6    or addiction to alcohol, narcotics, stimulants, or any 7    other chemical agent or drug.8        3. Willful or repeated violations of the rules of the 9    Department of Public Health or Department of Nuclear 10    Safety.11        4. Acceptance of a fee for service as a witness, 12    without the knowledge of the court, in addition to the fee 13    allowed by the court.14        5. Division of fees or agreeing to split or divide the 15    fees received for dental services with any person for 16    bringing or referring a patient, except in regard to 17    referral services as provided for under Section 45, or 18    assisting in the care or treatment of a patient, without 19    the knowledge of the patient or the patient's legal 20    representative. Nothing in this item 5 affects any bona 21    fide independent contractor or employment arrangements 22    among health care professionals, health facilities, health 23    care providers, or any other entities, except as otherwise 24    prohibited by law. Any employment arrangements may include 25    provisions for compensation, health insurance, pension, or 26    other employment benefits for the provision of services   HB4810- 47 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    within the scope of the licensee's practice under this 2    Act. Nothing in this item 5 shall be construed to require 3    an employment arrangement to receive professional fees for 4    services rendered. 5        6. Employing, procuring, inducing, aiding or abetting 6    a person not licensed or registered as a dentist, dental 7    therapist, or dental hygienist to engage in the practice 8    of dentistry, dental therapy, or dental hygiene. The 9    person practiced upon is not an accomplice, employer, 10    procurer, inducer, aider, or abettor abetter within the 11    meaning of this Act.12        7. Making any misrepresentations or false promises, 13    directly or indirectly, to influence, persuade or induce 14    dental patronage.15        8. Professional connection or association with or 16    lending the licensee's name to another for the illegal 17    practice of dentistry by another, or professional 18    connection or association with any person, firm or 19    corporation holding himself, herself, themselves, or 20    itself out in any manner contrary to this Act.21        9. Obtaining or seeking to obtain practice, money, or 22    any other things of value by false or fraudulent 23    representations, but not limited to, engaging in such 24    fraudulent practice to defraud the medical assistance 25    program of the Department of Healthcare and Family 26    Services (formerly Department of Public Aid) under the   HB4810- 48 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    Illinois Public Aid Code.2        10. Practicing under a false or, except as provided by 3    law, an assumed name.4        11. Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 5    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 6    defraud, or harm the public.7        12. Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 8    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by 9    sentencing for any crime, including, but not limited to, 10    convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, 11    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 12    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States that (i) 13    is a felony under the laws of this State or (ii) is a 14    misdemeanor, an essential element of which is dishonesty, 15    or that is directly related to the practice of dentistry.16        13. Permitting a dental hygienist, dental therapist, 17    dental assistant or other person under the licensee's 18    supervision to perform any operation not authorized by 19    this Act.20        14. Permitting more than 4 dental hygienists to be 21    employed under the licensee's supervision at any one time.22        15. A violation of any provision of this Act or any 23    rules promulgated under this Act.24        16. Taking impressions for or using the services of 25    any person, firm or corporation violating this Act.26        17. Violating any provision of Section 45 relating to   HB4810- 49 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    advertising.2        18. Discipline by another U.S. jurisdiction or foreign 3    nation, if at least one of the grounds for the discipline 4    is the same or substantially equivalent to those set forth 5    within this Act.6        19. Willfully failing to report an instance of 7    suspected child abuse or neglect as required by the Abused 8    and Neglected Child Reporting Act.9        20. Gross negligence in practice under this Act.10        21. The use or prescription for use of narcotics or 11    controlled substances or designated products as listed in 12    the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, in any way other 13    than for therapeutic purposes.14        22. Willfully making or filing false records or 15    reports in the licensee's practice as a dentist, 16    including, but not limited to, false records to support 17    claims against the dental assistance program of the 18    Department of Healthcare and Family Services (formerly 19    Illinois Department of Public Aid).20        23. Professional incompetence as manifested by poor 21    standards of care.22        24. Physical or mental illness, including, but not 23    limited to, deterioration through the aging process, or 24    loss of motor skills which results in a dentist's 25    inability to practice dentistry with reasonable judgment, 26    skill or safety. In enforcing this paragraph, the   HB4810- 50 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    Department may compel a person licensed to practice under 2    this Act to submit to a mental or physical examination 3    pursuant to the terms and conditions of Section 23b.4        25. Gross or repeated irregularities in billing for 5    services rendered to a patient. For purposes of this 6    paragraph 25, "irregularities in billing" shall include:7            (a) Reporting excessive charges for the purpose of 8        obtaining a total payment in excess of that usually 9        received by the dentist for the services rendered.10            (b) Reporting charges for services not rendered.11            (c) Incorrectly reporting services rendered for 12        the purpose of obtaining payment not earned.13        26. Continuing the active practice of dentistry while 14    knowingly having any infectious, communicable, or 15    contagious disease proscribed by rule or regulation of the 16    Department.17        27. Being named as a perpetrator in an indicated 18    report by the Department of Children and Family Services 19    pursuant to the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, 20    and upon proof by clear and convincing evidence that the 21    licensee has caused a child to be an abused child or 22    neglected child as defined in the Abused and Neglected 23    Child Reporting Act.24        28. Violating the Health Care Worker Self-Referral 25    Act.26        29. Abandonment of a patient.  HB4810- 51 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        30. Mental incompetency as declared by a court of 2    competent jurisdiction.3        31. A finding by the Department that the licensee, 4    after having the licensee's license placed on probationary 5    status, has violated the terms of probation. 6        32. Material misstatement in furnishing information to 7    the Department.8        33. Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 9    response to a written request by the Department in the 10    course of an investigation.11        34. Immoral conduct in the commission of any act, 12    including, but not limited to, commission of an act of 13    sexual misconduct related to the licensee's practice.14        35. Cheating on or attempting to subvert the licensing 15    examination administered under this Act.16        36. A pattern of practice or other behavior that 17    demonstrates incapacity or incompetence to practice under 18    this Act.19        37. Failure to establish and maintain records of 20    patient care and treatment as required under this Act.21        38. Failure to provide copies of dental records as 22    required by law.23        39. Failure of a licensed dentist who owns or is 24    employed at a dental office to give notice of an office 25    closure to the dentist's patients at least 30 days prior 26    to the office closure pursuant to Section 50.1.  HB4810- 52 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        40. Failure to maintain a sanitary work environment.2        41. Failure to comply with the provisions of Section 3    17.2 of this Act. 4    All proceedings to suspend, revoke, place on probationary 5status, or take any other disciplinary action as the 6Department may deem proper, with regard to a license on any of 7the foregoing grounds, must be commenced within 5 years after 8receipt by the Department of a complaint alleging the 9commission of or notice of the conviction order for any of the 10acts described herein. Except for fraud in procuring a 11license, no action shall be commenced more than 7 years after 12the date of the incident or act alleged to have violated this 13Section. The time during which the holder of the license was 14outside the State of Illinois shall not be included within any 15period of time limiting the commencement of disciplinary 16action by the Department.17    All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid within 1860 days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine 19or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing 20the fine.21    The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend the 22license of any person who fails to file a tax return, or to pay 23the tax, penalty, or interest shown in a filed tax return, or 24to pay any final assessment of tax, penalty or interest, as 25required by any tax Act administered by the Illinois 26Department of Revenue, until such time as the requirements of   HB4810- 53 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1any such tax Act are satisfied.2    Any dentist who has had a license suspended or revoked for 3more than 5 years must comply with the requirements for 4restoration set forth in Section 16 prior to being eligible 5for reinstatement from the suspension or revocation.6(Source: P.A. 103-425, eff. 1-1-24; 103-902, eff. 8-9-24; 7104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 8    (225 ILCS 25/24)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2324)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)10    Sec. 24. Refusal, suspension, or revocation of a dental 11therapist or dental hygienist license. The Department may 12refuse to issue or renew or may revoke, suspend, place on 13probation, reprimand or take other disciplinary or 14non-disciplinary action as the Department may deem proper, 15including imposing fines not to exceed $10,000 per violation, 16with regard to any dental therapist or dental hygienist 17license for any one or any combination of the following 18causes:19        1. Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or 20    procuring a license under this Act, or in connection with 21    applying for renewal of a license under this Act.22        2. Performing any operation not authorized by this 23    Act.24        3. Practicing dental therapy or dental hygiene other 25    than under the supervision of a licensed dentist as   HB4810- 54 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    provided by this Act.2        4. The willful violation of, or the willful procuring 3    of, or knowingly assisting in the violation of, any Act 4    which is now or which hereafter may be in force in this 5    State relating to the use of habit-forming drugs.6        5. The obtaining of, or an attempt to obtain a 7    license, or practice in the profession, or money, or any 8    other thing of value by fraudulent representation.9        6. Gross negligence in performing the operative 10    procedure of dental therapy or dental hygiene.11        7. Active practice of dental therapy or dental hygiene 12    while knowingly having any infectious, communicable, or 13    contagious disease proscribed by rule or regulation of the 14    Department.15        8. Inability to practice with reasonable judgment, 16    skill, or safety as a result of habitual or excessive use 17    or addiction to alcohol, narcotics, stimulants, or any 18    other chemical agent or drug.19        9. Conviction by plea of guilty or nolo contendere, 20    finding of guilt, jury verdict, or entry of judgment or by 21    sentencing of any crime, including, but not limited to, 22    convictions, preceding sentences of supervision, 23    conditional discharge, or first offender probation, under 24    the laws of any jurisdiction of the United States that (i) 25    is a felony or (ii) is a misdemeanor, an essential element 26    of which is dishonesty, or that is directly related to the   HB4810- 55 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    practice of dental therapy or dental hygiene.2        10. Aiding or abetting the unlicensed practice of 3    dentistry, dental therapy, or dental hygiene.4        11. Discipline by another U.S. jurisdiction or a 5    foreign nation, if at least one of the grounds for the 6    discipline is the same or substantially equivalent to 7    those set forth in this Act.8        12. Violating the Health Care Worker Self-Referral 9    Act.10        13. Violating the prohibitions of Section 38.1 of this 11    Act.12        14. Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or 13    unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, 14    defraud, or harm the public.15        15. A finding by the Department that the licensee, 16    after having the licensee's license placed on probationary 17    status, has violated the terms of probation. 18        16. Material misstatement in furnishing information to 19    the Department.20        17. Failing, within 60 days, to provide information in 21    response to a written request by the Department in the 22    course of an investigation.23        18. Immoral conduct in the commission of any act, 24    including, but not limited to, commission of an act of 25    sexual misconduct related to the licensee's practice.26        19. Cheating on or attempting to subvert the licensing   HB4810- 56 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    examination administered under this Act.2        20. Violations of this Act or of the rules promulgated 3    under this Act.4        21. Practicing under a false or, except as provided by 5    law, an assumed name. 6    The provisions of this Act relating to proceedings for the 7suspension and revocation of a license to practice dentistry 8shall apply to proceedings for the suspension or revocation of 9a license as a dental therapist or a dental hygienist.10    All proceedings to suspend, revoke, place on probationary 11status, or take any other disciplinary action as the 12Department may deem proper with regard to a license on any of 13the grounds contained in this Section, must be commenced 14within 5 years after receipt by the Department of a complaint 15alleging the commission of or notice of the conviction order 16for any of the acts described in this Section. Except for fraud 17in procuring a license, no action shall be commenced more than 187 years after the date of the incident or act alleged to have 19violated this Section. The time during which the holder of the 20license was outside the State of Illinois shall not be 21included within any period of time limiting the commencement 22of disciplinary action by the Department.23    All fines imposed under this Section shall be paid within 2460 days after the effective date of the order imposing the fine 25or in accordance with the terms set forth in the order imposing 26the fine.  HB4810- 57 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    Any dental therapist or dental hygienist who has had a 2license suspended or revoked for more than 5 years must comply 3with the requirements for restoration set forth in Section 16 4prior to being eligible for reinstatement from the suspension 5or revocation. 6(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 7    (225 ILCS 25/25)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2325)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)9    Sec. 25. Notice of hearing; investigations and informal 10conferences.11    (a) Upon the motion of either the Department or the Board 12or upon the verified complaint in writing of any person 13setting forth facts which if proven would constitute grounds 14for refusal, suspension, or revocation of a license under this 15Act, the Board shall investigate the actions of any person, 16hereinafter called the respondent, who holds or represents 17that the person holds a license. All such motions or 18complaints shall be brought to the Board.19    (b) Prior to taking an in-person statement from a dentist, 20dental therapist, or dental hygienist who is the subject of a 21complaint, the investigator shall inform the dentist, the 22dental therapist, or the dental hygienist in writing:23        (1) that the dentist, dental therapist, or dental 24    hygienist is the subject of a complaint; 25        (2) that the dentist, dental therapist, or dental   HB4810- 58 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    hygienist need not immediately proceed with the interview 2    and may seek appropriate consultation prior to consenting 3    to the interview; and4        (3) that failure of the dentist, dental therapist, or 5    dental hygienist to proceed with the interview shall not 6    prohibit the Department from conducting a visual 7    inspection of the facility. 8    A Department investigator's failure to comply with this 9subsection may not be the sole ground for dismissal of any 10order of the Department filed upon a finding of a violation or 11for dismissal of a pending investigation.12    (b-5) The duly authorized dental investigators of the 13Department shall have the right to enter and inspect, during 14business hours, the business premises of a dentist licensed 15under this Act or of a person who holds oneself out as 16practicing dentistry, with due consideration for patient care 17of the subject of the investigation, so as to inspect the 18physical premises and equipment and furnishings therein. This 19right of inspection shall not include inspection of business, 20medical, or personnel records located on the premises without 21a Department subpoena issued in accordance with Section 25.1 22of this Act or Section 2105-105 of the Department of 23Professional Regulation Law of the Civil Administrative Code 24of Illinois. For the purposes of this Section, "business 25premises" means the office or offices where the dentist 26conducts the practice of dentistry.  HB4810- 59 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    (c) If the Department concludes on the basis of a 2complaint or its initial investigation that there is a 3possible violation of the Act, the Department may:4        (1) schedule a hearing pursuant to this Act; or5        (2) request in writing that the dentist, dental 6    therapist, or dental hygienist being investigated attend 7    an informal conference with representatives of the 8    Department.9    The request for an informal conference shall contain the 10nature of the alleged actions or inactions that constitute the 11possible violations.12    A dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist shall be 13allowed to have legal counsel at the informal conference. If 14the informal conference results in a consent order between the 15accused dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist and the 16Department, the consent order must be approved by the 17Secretary. However, if the consent order would result in a 18fine exceeding $10,000 or the suspension or revocation of the 19dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist license, the 20consent order must be approved by the Board and the Secretary. 21Participation in the informal conference by a dentist, a 22dental therapist, a dental hygienist, or the Department and 23any admissions or stipulations made by a dentist, a dental 24therapist, a dental hygienist, or the Department at the 25informal conference, including any agreements in a consent 26order that is subsequently disapproved by either the Board or   HB4810- 60 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1the Secretary, shall not be used against the dentist, dental 2therapist, dental hygienist, or Department in at any 3subsequent hearing and shall not become a part of the record of 4the hearing.5    (d) The Secretary shall, before suspending, revoking, 6placing on probationary status, or taking any other 7disciplinary action as the Secretary may deem proper with 8regard to any license, at least 30 days prior to the date set 9for the hearing, notify the respondent in writing of any 10charges made and the time and place for a hearing of the 11charges before the Board, direct the respondent to file the 12written answer thereto to the Board under oath within 20 days 13after the service on the respondent of such notice and inform 14the respondent that if the respondent fails to file such 15answer, default will be taken against the respondent and the 16respondent's license may be suspended, revoked, placed on 17probationary status, or other disciplinary action may be taken 18with regard thereto, including limiting the scope, nature or 19extent of the respondent's practice, as the Secretary may deem 20proper.21    (e) Such written notice and any notice in such proceedings 22thereafter may be served by delivery personally to the 23respondent, or by registered or certified mail to the 24respondent's licensee's address of record or email address of 25record.26(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.)   HB4810- 61 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    (225 ILCS 25/25.1)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)3    Sec. 25.1. Subpoena powers.4    (a) The Department, upon a determination by the 5chairperson of the Board that reasonable cause exists that a 6violation of one or more of the grounds for discipline set 7forth in Section 23 or Section 24 of this Act has occurred or 8is occurring, may subpoena, without patient consent, the 9dental records of individual patients of dentists, dental 10therapists, and dental hygienists licensed under this Act.11    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Section, the 12Board and the Department may subpoena copies of hospital, 13medical, or dental records in mandatory report cases alleging 14death or permanent bodily injury when consent to obtain the 15records has not been provided by a patient or a patient's legal 16representative. All records and other information received 17pursuant to a subpoena shall be confidential and shall be 18afforded the same status as information concerning medical 19studies under Part 21 of Article VIII of the Code of Civil 20Procedure. The use of these records shall be restricted to 21members of the Board, the dental coordinator, and appropriate 22Department staff designated by the Secretary for the purpose 23of determining the existence of one or more grounds for 24discipline of the dentist, dental therapist, or dental 25hygienist as provided for in Section 23 or Section 24 of this   HB4810- 62 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1Act.2    (c) Any review of an individual patient's records shall be 3conducted by the Department in strict confidentiality, 4provided that the patient records shall be admissible in a 5disciplinary hearing before the Secretary, the Board, or a 6hearing officer designated by the Department when necessary to 7substantiate the grounds for discipline alleged against the 8dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist licensed under 9this Act.10    (d) The Department may provide reimbursement for fees and 11mileage associated with its subpoena power in the same manner 12prescribed by law for judicial procedure in a civil case.13    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be deemed to supersede 14the provisions of Part 21 of Article VIII of the Code of Civil 15Procedure, now or hereafter amended, to the extent applicable.16    (f) All information gathered by the Department during any 17investigation, including information subpoenaed under this Act 18and the investigative file, shall be kept for the confidential 19use of the Secretary, the dental coordinator, the Board's 20attorneys, the dental investigative staff, authorized clerical 21staff, and persons employed by contract to advise the dental 22coordinator or the Department as provided in this Act, except 23that the Department may disclose information and documents to 24(i) a federal, State, or local law enforcement agency pursuant 25to a subpoena in an ongoing criminal investigation or (ii) a 26dental licensing authority of another state or jurisdiction   HB4810- 63 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1pursuant to an official request made by that authority. Any 2information or documents disclosed by the Department to a 3federal, State, or local law enforcement agency may only be 4used by that agency for the investigation and prosecution of a 5criminal offense. Any information or documents disclosed by 6the Department to a dental licensing authority of another 7state or jurisdiction may only be used by that authority for 8investigations and disciplinary proceedings with regards to a 9license. 10    This subsection (f) applies only to causes of action 11accruing on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act 12of the 96th General Assembly. 13(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 14    (225 ILCS 25/26)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2326)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)16    Sec. 26. Disciplinary actions. 17    (a) In case the respondent, after receiving notice, fails 18to file an answer, the respondent's license may, in the 19discretion of the Secretary, having first received the 20recommendation of the Board, be suspended, revoked, placed on 21probationary status, or the Secretary may take whatever 22disciplinary or non-disciplinary action the Secretary may deem 23proper, including limiting the scope, nature, or extent of the 24person's practice or the imposition of a fine, without a 25hearing, if the act or acts charged constitute sufficient   HB4810- 64 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1grounds for such action under this Act.2    (b) The Secretary may temporarily suspend the license of a 3dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist without a 4hearing, simultaneous to the institution of proceedings for a 5hearing under this Act, if the Secretary finds that evidence 6in the Secretary's possession indicates that a dentist's, 7dental therapist's, or dental hygienist's continuation in 8practice would constitute an immediate danger to the public. 9In the event that the Secretary temporarily suspends the 10license of a dentist, a dental therapist, or a dental 11hygienist without a hearing, a hearing by the Board must be 12held within 15 days after such suspension has occurred.13    (c) The entry of a judgment by any circuit court 14establishing that any person holding a license under this Act 15is a person subject to involuntary admission under the Mental 16Health and Developmental Disabilities Code shall operate as a 17suspension of that license. That person may resume the 18person's practice only upon a finding by the Board that the 19person has been determined to be no longer subject to 20involuntary admission by the court and upon the Board's 21recommendation to the Secretary that the person be permitted 22to resume the person's practice.23(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 24    (225 ILCS 25/34)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2334)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)  HB4810- 65 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    Sec. 34. Confidential information; disclosure. In all 2hearings conducted under this Act, information received, 3pursuant to law, relating to any information acquired by a 4dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist in attending 5any patient in a professional character, and necessary to 6professionally serve such patient, shall be deemed strictly 7confidential and shall only be made available, either as part 8of the record of a hearing hereunder or otherwise: (1) when 9such record is required, in its entirety, for purposes of 10judicial review pursuant to this Act; or (2) upon the express, 11written consent of the patient, or in the case of the patient's 12death or disability, the patient's personal representative.13(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 14    (225 ILCS 25/36)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2336)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)16    Sec. 36. Reports of violations; immunity Violations - 17Immunity. Any person licensed under this Act, the Illinois 18State Dental Society, Illinois Dental Hygienists' Hygienists 19Association, or any other similar group or component society 20or member thereof, or any other person, may report to the Board 21any information such person, association or society may have 22which appears to show that a dentist, dental therapist, or 23dental hygienist is or may be in violation of any of the 24provisions of this Act. Any such person, association, or 25society, participating in good faith in the making of a   HB4810- 66 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1report, under the Act, shall have immunity from any liability, 2civil, criminal, or that otherwise that may might result by 3reason of such action. For the purpose of any proceedings, 4civil or criminal, the good faith of any such person, 5association, or society shall be presumed.6(Source: P.A. 85-946.) 7    (225 ILCS 25/37)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2337)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)9    Sec. 37. Unlicensed practice; injunctions. The practice of 10dentistry by any person not holding a valid and current 11license under this Act is declared to be inimical to the public 12welfare, to constitute a public nuisance, and to cause 13irreparable harm to the public welfare.14    A person is considered to practice dentistry who: 15        (1) employs a dentist, dental therapist, dental 16    hygienist, or other entity which can provide dental 17    services under this Act; 18        (2) directs or controls the use of any dental 19    equipment or material while such equipment or material is 20    being used for the provision of dental services, provided 21    that this provision shall not be construed to prohibit a 22    person from obtaining professional advice or assistance in 23    obtaining or from leasing the equipment or material, 24    provided the advice, assistance, or lease does not 25    restrict or interfere with the custody, control, or use of   HB4810- 67 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    the equipment or material by the person; 2        (3) directs, controls or interferes with a dentist's, 3    dental therapist's, or dental hygienist's clinical 4    judgment; or 5        (4) exercises direction or control, by written 6    contract, license, or otherwise, over a dentist, dental 7    therapist, dental hygienist, or other entity which can 8    provide dental services under this Act in the selection of 9    a course of treatment; limitation of patient referrals; 10    content of patient records; policies and decisions 11    relating to refunds (if the refund payment would be 12    reportable under federal law to the National Practitioner 13    Data Bank) and warranties and the clinical content of 14    advertising; and final decisions relating to employment of 15    dental assistants, dental therapists, and dental 16    hygienists. Nothing in this Act shall, however, be 17    construed as prohibiting the seeking or giving of advice 18    or assistance with respect to these matters.19    The purpose of this Section is to prevent a non-dentist 20from influencing or otherwise interfering with the exercise of 21independent professional judgment by a dentist, dental 22therapist, dental hygienist, or other entity which can provide 23dental services under this Act. Nothing in this Section shall 24be construed to prohibit insurers and managed care plans from 25operating pursuant to the applicable provisions of the 26Illinois Insurance Code under which the entities are licensed.  HB4810- 68 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    The Secretary, the Attorney General, the State's attorney 2of any county in the State, or any person may maintain an 3action in the name of the People of the State of Illinois, and 4may apply for injunctive relief in any circuit court to enjoin 5such person from engaging in such practice; and upon the 6filing of a verified petition in such court, the court if 7satisfied by affidavit, or otherwise, that such person has 8been engaged in such practice without a valid and current 9license so to do, may enter a temporary restraining order 10without notice or bond, enjoining the defendant from such 11further practice. Only the showing of non-licensure, by 12affidavit or otherwise, is necessary in order for a temporary 13injunction to issue. A copy of the verified complaint shall be 14served upon the defendant and the proceedings shall thereafter 15be conducted as in other civil cases except as modified by this 16Section. If it is established that the defendant has been, or 17is engaged in such unlawful practice, the court may enter an 18order or judgment perpetually enjoining the defendant from 19further such practice. In all proceedings hereunder the court, 20in its discretion, may apportion the costs among the parties 21interested in the action, including cost of filing the 22complaint, service of process, witness fees and expenses, 23court reporter charges and reasonable attorneys' fees. In case 24of violation of any injunctive order entered under the 25provisions of this Section, the court may summarily try and 26punish the offender for contempt of court. Such injunction   HB4810- 69 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1proceedings shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, all 2penalties and other remedies provided in this Act.3    This Section does not apply to an executor, administrator, 4guardian, or authorized representative contracting with 5another dentist or dentists to continue the operations of a 6deceased or incapacitated dentist's practice under Section 738.2 of this Act. 8(Source: P.A. 97-1013, eff. 8-17-12.) 9    (225 ILCS 25/38.1)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)11    Sec. 38.1. Prohibition against interference by 12non-dentists. The purpose of this Section is to ensure that 13each dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist practicing 14in this State meets minimum requirements for safe practice 15without clinical interference by persons not licensed under 16this Act. It is the legislative intent that dental services be 17provided only in accordance with the provisions of this Act 18and not be delegated to unlicensed persons.19    Unless otherwise authorized by this Act, a dentist, dental 20therapist, or dental hygienist is prohibited from providing 21dental services in this State, if the dentist, dental 22therapist, or dental hygienist: 23        (1) is employed by any person other than a dentist to 24    provide dental services, except as set forth in Section 25    38.2 of this Act; or   HB4810- 70 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1        (2) allows any person other than another dentist to 2    direct, control, or interfere with the dentist's, dental 3    therapist's, or dental hygienist's clinical judgment. 4    Clinical judgment shall include but not be limited to such 5    matters as the dentist's, dental therapist's, or dental 6    hygienist's selection of a course of treatment, limitation 7    of patient referrals, content of patient records, policies 8    and decisions relating to refunds (if the refund payment 9    would be reportable under federal law to the National 10    Practitioner Data Bank) and warranties and the clinical 11    content of advertising, and final decisions relating to 12    employment of dental assistants, dental therapists, and 13    dental hygienists. This paragraph (2) shall not be 14    construed to limit a patient's right of informed consent. 15    An executor, administrator, guardian, or authorized 16    representative contracting with another dentist or 17    dentists to continue the operations of a deceased or 18    incapacitated dentist's practice under Section 38.2 of 19    this Act who violates this paragraph (2) is subject to the 20    civil penalties set forth in Section 8.5 of this Act. 21(Source: P.A. 94-1028, eff. 1-1-07.) 22    (225 ILCS 25/51)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2351)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)24    Sec. 51. Dispensing drugs or medicine. Any dentist or 25dental therapist who dispenses any drug or medicine shall   HB4810- 71 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1dispense such drug or medicine in good faith and shall affix to 2the box, bottle, vessel, or package containing the same a 3label indicating:4        (a) the date on which such drug or medicine is 5    dispensed;6        (b) the name of the patient;7        (c) the last name of the person dispensing such drug 8    or medicine;9        (d) the directions for use thereof; and10        (e) the proprietary name or names or the established 11    name or names of the drug or medicine, the dosage and 12    quantity, except as otherwise authorized by regulation of 13    the Department.14    This Section shall not apply to drugs and medicines in a 15package which bears a label of the manufacturer containing 16information describing its contents which is in compliance 17with requirements of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act 18and the Illinois Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and which is 19dispensed without consideration by a dentist. "Drug" and 20"medicine" have the meanings ascribed to them in the Pharmacy 21Practice Act, as now or hereafter amended; "good faith" has 22the meaning ascribed to it in subsection (v) of Section 102 of 23the "Illinois Controlled Substances Act", as amended.24(Source: P.A. 95-689, eff. 10-29-07.) 25    (225 ILCS 25/54.2)  HB4810- 72 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)2    Sec. 54.2. Dental responders. A dentist, dental therapist, 3or dental hygienist who is a dental responder is deemed to be 4acting within the bounds of the dentist or dental hygienist's 5license when providing disaster, immunizations, mobile, and 6humanitarian care during a declared local, State, or national 7emergency.8(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 9    (225 ILCS 25/54.3)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)11    Sec. 54.3. Vaccinations.12    (a) Notwithstanding Section 54.2 of this Act, a dentist or 13dental therapist may administer vaccinations upon completion 14of appropriate training set forth by rule and approved by the 15Department on appropriate vaccine storage, proper 16administration, and addressing contraindications and adverse 17reactions. Vaccinations shall be limited to patients 18 years 18of age and older pursuant to a valid prescription or standing 19order by a physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 20branches who, in the course of professional practice, 21administers vaccines to patients. Methods of communication 22shall be established for consultation with the physician in 23person or by telecommunications.24    (b) Vaccinations administered by a dentist or dental 25therapist shall be limited to influenza (inactivated influenza   HB4810- 73 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1vaccine and live attenuated influenza intranasal vaccine). 2Vaccines shall only be administered by the dentist or dental 3therapist and shall not be delegated to an assistant or any 4other person. Vaccination of a patient by a dentist or dental 5therapist shall be documented in the patient's dental record 6and the record shall be retained in accordance with current 7dental recordkeeping standards. The dentist or dental 8therapist shall notify the patient's primary care physician of 9each dose of vaccine administered to the patient and shall 10enter all patient level data or update the patient's current 11record. The dentist or dental therapist may provide this 12notice to the patient's physician electronically. In addition, 13the dentist or dental therapist shall enter all patient level 14data on vaccines administered in the immunization data 15registry maintained by the Department of Public Health.16    (c) A dentist or dental therapist shall only provide 17vaccinations under this Section if contracted with and 18credentialed by the patient's health insurance, health 19maintenance organization, or other health plan to specifically 20provide the vaccinations allowed under this Section. Persons 21enrolled in Medicare or Medicaid may only receive the 22vaccinations allowed for under this Section from dentists or 23dental therapists who are authorized to do so by the federal 24Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Department 25of Healthcare and Family Services.26    (d) The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to   HB4810- 74 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1implement this Section.2(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.) 3    (225 ILCS 25/55)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2355)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)5    Sec. 55. Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The 6Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is hereby expressly 7adopted and incorporated herein as if all of the provisions of 8that Act were included in this Act, except that the provision 9of subsection (d) of Section 10-65 of the Illinois 10Administrative Procedure Act that provides that at hearings 11the dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist has the 12right to show compliance with all lawful requirements for 13retention, continuation or renewal of the license is 14specifically excluded. For the purposes of this Act the notice 15required under Section 10-25 of the Illinois Administrative 16Procedure Act is deemed sufficient when mailed or emailed to 17the last known address or email address of a party.18(Source: P.A. 104-151, eff. 1-1-26.)  HB4810- 75 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    225 ILCS 25/2from Ch. 111, par. 23024    225 ILCS 25/45    225 ILCS 25/5from Ch. 111, par. 23056    225 ILCS 25/8.57    225 ILCS 25/12.5 new8    225 ILCS 25/13.05 new9    225 ILCS 25/13.15 new10    225 ILCS 25/14.5 new11    225 ILCS 25/14.6 new12    225 ILCS 25/15.5 new13    225 ILCS 25/16from Ch. 111, par. 231614    225 ILCS 25/16.1from Ch. 111, par. 2316.115    225 ILCS 25/1716    225 ILCS 25/18.5 new17    225 ILCS 25/19from Ch. 111, par. 231918    225 ILCS 25/19.119    225 ILCS 25/20from Ch. 111, par. 232020    225 ILCS 25/21from Ch. 111, par. 232121    225 ILCS 25/23from Ch. 111, par. 232322    225 ILCS 25/24from Ch. 111, par. 232423    225 ILCS 25/25from Ch. 111, par. 232524    225 ILCS 25/25.125    225 ILCS 25/26from Ch. 111, par. 2326  HB4810- 76 -LRB104 17877 AAS 31313 b1    225 ILCS 25/34from Ch. 111, par. 23342    225 ILCS 25/36from Ch. 111, par. 23363    225 ILCS 25/37from Ch. 111, par. 23374    225 ILCS 25/38.15    225 ILCS 25/51from Ch. 111, par. 23516    225 ILCS 25/54.27    225 ILCS 25/54.38    225 ILCS 25/55from Ch. 111, par. 2355